Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.080

City manager—Creation of departments.

On recommendation of the city manager, the council may create such departments, offices and employments as may be found necessary and may determine the powers and duties of each department or office.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.18.080. Prior: 1943 c 271 s 16; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-25.]